California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The department shall require that each of the accommodations in a time-share plan offering time-share use interests be conveyed to a trustee or an association acceptable to the commissioner prior to the closing of the escrow for the first sale of a time-share use interest that entitles the purchaser to occupy the accommodation in question.

(b) If the accommodation in a time-share plan offering time-share use interests that is free and clear of blanket encumbrances, other than a lien of current real property taxes, is conveyed to a trustee or an association, the trust or association instruments shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Transfer of title to the accommodations to the trustee or association.

(2) If the time-share use interests are conveyed to a trust, the association as a party to the trust or an express third-party beneficiary of the trust.

(3) Notice to the department of the intention of the trustee to resign, if applicable.

(4) Continuance of the trustee in that capacity until a successor trustee acceptable to the department assumes the position, if applicable.

(5) Prohibition against any amendments of the trust or association instruments adversely affecting the interests or rights of time-share interest owners without the prior approval of the association.

(6) Instructions for the distribution of condemnation or insurance proceeds by the trustee or the association.

(c) The department may require that each of the accommodations in a time-share plan offering time-share estate interests that is subject to a blanket encumbrance be conveyed to a trustee acceptable to the department prior to the closing of the escrow for the first sale of a time-share estate which entitles the purchaser to occupy the accommodation in question.

(d) If an accommodation in the time-share plan is conveyed to a trustee pursuant to subdivision (c), the trust instrument shall include all of the following provisions in addition to those set forth in subdivision (b):

(1) The deposit into trust, and the retention for the duration of the trust, of nondelinquent installment sales contracts or promissory notes of time-share interests purchases having an aggregate principal balance owing not ordinarily less than 150 percent of the difference between the aggregate principal balance owing under blanket encumbrances against the accommodation and the amount of money, or its equivalent, in the trust and available at any time to be applied to the reduction of the principal balance of the blanket encumbrances.

(A) The trust instrument shall further provide that if the 150 percent requirement has not been met within six months after execution of the trust instrument by the developer, the trustee shall thereafter retain in the trust, or apply to debt service on the blanket encumbrance, the entire amount of all installment payments received on contracts or promissory notes until the 150 percent requirement has been met.

(B) For purposes of this regulation, a contract or promissory note is deemed delinquent when an installment payment is more than 60 days past due.

(C) If the developer for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this subdivision proposes to deposit installment sales contracts or promissory notes of obligor other than purchasers of interests in the time-share plan into the trust, the developer shall have the burden of establishing the liquidated value of the notes and contracts to the satisfaction of the department.

(2) The deposit into trust, and the retention for the duration of the trust, of funds in an amount at all times sufficient to pay the total of three successive monthly installments of debt service on the blanket encumbrance.

(A) If installments of debt service on a blanket encumbrance that is fully amortized are due less frequently than monthly, the funds retained in the trust shall be sufficient to pay all installments becoming due within the next succeeding six months, or, if no installments are due within the next succeeding six months the next installment due.

(B) If a blanket encumbrance against the trust property is an interest-only loan, contains a balloon payment provision, or is otherwise not fully amortized under the terms for repayment, the trust instrument shall require that the developer make monthly payments into the trust sufficient to pay debt service installments as they become due and to create a sinking fund to extinguish the debt at its maturity.

(3) Payment by the trustee of debt service on the blanket encumbrance, property taxes, or assessments on insurance premiums, either as the entity having primary responsibilities for the payments or the entity secondarily responsible if the person with primary responsibility fails to make the payments in a timely manner.

(4) The deposit or investment by the trustee of funds constituting a part of the trust corpus in interest bearing accounts, treasury bills, certificates of deposit, or similar investments.

(e) In the case of a time-share plan offering time-share use interests that have been conveyed to a trustee, the trust for the accommodation shall be irrevocable during the time that any time-share interest owner has a right to the occupancy of an accommodation.

(f) In the case of a time-share plan offering time-share use interests that have been conveyed to an association, the association shall not be dissolved or terminated during the time that any time-share interest owner has the right to occupancy of an accommodation.

(g) In a time-share plan offering time-share estate interests, the trust for an accommodation shall be irrevocable until the extinguishment of all blanket monetary encumbrances against the accommodation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11256.

(a) The contract proposed to be used by a developer applying for a public report for the sale or lease of time-share interests shall provide that if the escrow for sale or lease of a time-share interest does not close on or before the date set forth in the contract, or a later closing date mutually agreed to by the developer and the prospective purchaser or lessee, within 15 days after the closing date set forth in the contract or an extended closing date mutually agreed to by the developer and the prospective purchaser or lessee, the developer shall, except as provided in subdivisions (c) to (h), inclusive, order all of the money remitted by the prospective purchaser or lessee under the terms of the contract for acquisition of the time-share interest (purchase money) to be refunded to the
 prospective purchaser or lessee. Any extension of the closing of escrow shall be in writing and shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that the purchaser is not obligated to extend the closing of escrow.

(b) The contract may provide for disbursements or charges to be made against purchase money for payments to third parties for credit reports, escrow services, preliminary title reports, appraisals, and loan processing services by the parties if the contract includes the following:

(1) Specific enumeration of all of the disbursements or charges that may be made against purchase money.

(2) The developer’s estimate of the total amount of the disbursements and charges.

(c) Any contractual provision that calls for disbursement or a charge against purchase
 money based upon the prospective purchaser’s or lessee’s alleged failure to complete the purchase of the time-share interest shall conform with Sections 1675, 1676, 1677, and 1678 of the Civil Code.

(d) Except for a disbursement made following substantial compliance with the procedures set forth in subdivision (f) or pursuant to a written agreement of the parties that either cancels the contract or is executed after the final closing date specified by the parties, a disbursement or charge against purchase money as liquidated damages may be done only pursuant to a determination by a court of law, or by an arbitrator if the parties have so provided by contract, that the developer is entitled to a disbursement or charge against purchase money as liquidated damages.

(e) A contractual provision for a determination by arbitration that the developer is entitled to a disbursement or
 charge against purchase money as liquidated damages shall require that the arbitration be conducted in accordance with procedures that are equivalent in substance to the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association or another third-party arbitration organization selected by the parties and in accordance with Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure that any arbitration include every cause of action that has arisen between the prospective purchaser or lessee and the developer under the contract, and that the developer remit the fee to initiate arbitration with the costs of the arbitration ultimately to be borne as determined by the arbitrator.

(f) The contract of sale may include a procedure under which purchase money may be disbursed by the escrowholder to the developer as liquidated damages upon the prospective purchaser’s or lessee’s failure to timely give the escrowholder the
 prospective purchaser’s or lessee’s written objection to disbursement of purchase money as liquidated damages. This procedure shall contain at least the following elements:

(1) The developer shall give written notice, in the manner prescribed by Section 116.340 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service in a small claims action, to the escrowholder and to the prospective purchaser or lessee that the prospective purchaser or lessee is in default under the contract that the developer is demanding that the escrowholder remit _____ dollars ($____) from the purchase money to the developer as liquidated damages unless, within 20 days, the prospective purchaser or lessee gives the escrowholder the prospective purchaser’s or lessee’s written objection to the disbursement of purchase money as liquidated damages.

(2) The prospective purchaser or lessee shall have a period of 20 days from
 the date of receipt of the developer’s 20-day notice and demand in which to give the escrowholder the prospective purchaser or lessee written objection to the disbursement of purchase money as liquidated damages.

(g) The contract may not make the prospective purchaser’s or lessee’s failure to timely give the escrowholder the aforesaid written objection a waiver of any cause of action the prospective purchaser or lessee may have against the developer under the contract unless the waiver is conditioned upon service of the developer’s 20-day notice and demand in a manner prescribed by Section 116.340 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service in a small claims action.

(h) If the developer has had the use of purchase money pending consummation of the sale or lease transaction under authorization by the department pursuant to Section 11243, the developer shall immediately upon alleging
 the default of the prospective purchaser or lessee, transmit to the escrowholder, funds equal to all of the purchase money paid by the prospective purchaser or lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 153, Sec. 5.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Management and Governance [11265. - 11275.]

11265.

(a) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan, the following requirements apply:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), regular assessments to defray the expenses of maintaining the time-share property and operating the time-share plan shall be levied against each time-share interest owner according to the ratio that the number of time-share interests owned by a time-share interest owner assessed bears to the total number of time-share interests subject to assessments. Regular assessments levied by the association shall not exceed the amount necessary to defray the estimated expenses for which the assessments are levied.

(2) The assessment against each owner in the time-share plan may be determined according to a formula or schedule under which assessments against each time-share interest owner are equitably apportioned in accordance with operational and maintenance costs attributable to each time-share interest owner.

(3) A special assessment shall be levied upon the same basis as that prescribed for the levying of regular assessments except in the case where the special assessment is levied against a time-share interest owner for the purpose of reimbursing the association for costs incurred in bringing the time-share interest owner into compliance with provisions of the governing instruments for the time-share plan.

(4) All time-share interests in the time-share plan for which a public report has been issued including those time-share interests held by the developer of the time-share plan are interests subject to the payment of regular and special assessments.

(5) The governing body of the association may be authorized by the governing instruments to impose, without the vote or written assent of the association, a regular annual assessment per time-share interest that is as much as 20 percent greater than the regular annual assessment for the immediately preceding fiscal year. An annual assessment for each time-share interest that is more than 20 percent greater than the regular assessment per time-share interest for the immediately preceding fiscal year may not be levied without the vote or written assent of a majority of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer. An increase in the annual assessment attributable to an increase in real property taxes against accommodations of the time-share property shall be excluded in determining whether the annual assessment is more than 20 percent greater than the regular assessment per interest for the preceding fiscal year.

(6) Except as provided in this section, special assessments against time-share interest owners in a time-share plan may not be imposed without the vote or written assent of a majority of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer. The governing body of the association may be authorized by the governing instruments to impose special assessments without the vote or written assent of the association as follows:

(A) Special assessments against all time-share interest owners in the time-share plan, other than a special assessment to restore or rebuild because of damage or destruction to an accommodation, which in the aggregate in any fiscal year do not exceed 5 percent of the budgeted gross expenses of the association for that fiscal year.

(B) A special assessment for the repair or rebuilding of an accommodation that does not exceed 10 percent of the budgeted gross expenses of the association for the fiscal year in which the assessment is levied.

(C) Special assessments against a time-share interest owner or owners for the purpose of reimbursing the association for costs incurred in bringing the time-share interest owner into compliance with provisions of the governing instruments for the time-share plan.

(7) Regular assessments against all of the time-share interests in an accommodation of the time-share plan shall commence on the same date. Regular assessments shall commence on the first day of the month following the closing of the escrow of the first sale of a time-share interest in the time-share plan, but may be delayed to the date of commencement of time-share interest owners’ occupancy rights in the accommodation or to a date that is not more than six months later than the date of closing of the first sale involving a right to use the accommodation, whichever occurs earlier in time.

(b) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state the time-share instruments shall include the subject matter set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The time-share instruments shall be in compliance with the applicable laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property or component site is located, and if a conflict exists between the affirmative standards of the laws of the situs state and the requirements set forth in this section, the law of the situs state shall control. If the time-share instruments provide for the matters contained in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the time-share instruments shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and this subdivision and the developer shall not be required to make revisions in order to comply with paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and this subdivision. If the maximum increase in annual assessments for a time-share plan located outside of this state is greater than the 20 percent set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the public report shall include the following disclosure in conspicuous 14-point type:
YOUR ANNUAL ASSESSMENTS ARE NOT SUBJECT TO THE CALIFORNIA LIMITATION OF A 20% ANNUAL INCREASE WITHOUT THE VOTE OF THE OWNERS OTHER THAN THE DEVELOPER. YOUR ASSESSMENT MAY BE INCREASED BY AS MUCH AS ____% PER YEAR.

(c) For nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plans the following requirements apply:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), regular assessments to defray the expenses of maintaining and operating the multisite time-share plan shall be levied against each time-share interest owner according to the ratio that the number of time-share interests owned by a time-share interest owner assessed bears to the total number of time-share interests subject to assessments.

(2) The assessment against each time-share interest owner in the multisite time-share plan may be determined according to a formula or schedule under which assessments against each time-share interest owner are equitably apportioned in accordance with operational and maintenance costs attributable to each time-share interest owner.

(3) A special assessment shall be levied upon the same basis as that prescribed for the levying of regular assessments except in the case where the special assessment is levied against a time-share interest owner for the purpose of reimbursing the association for costs incurred in bringing the time-share interest owner into compliance with provisions of the governing instruments for the time-share plan.

(4) All time-share interests in the multisite time-share plan for which a public report has been issued including those time-share interests held by the developer of the multisite time-share plan are interests subject to the payment of regular and special assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.1.

(a) Regular and special assessments levied pursuant to the time-share instrument are delinquent 30 days after they become due, unless the time-share instrument provides a longer time period, in which case the longer time period shall apply. If an assessment is delinquent, the association may recover all of the following:

(1) Reasonable costs incurred in collecting the delinquent assessment, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

(2) A late charge not exceeding 10 percent of the delinquent assessment or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater, unless the time-share instrument specifies a late charge in a smaller amount, in which case any late charge imposed shall not exceed the amount specified in the governing instrument.

(3) Interest on all sums imposed in accordance with this section, including the delinquent assessments, reasonable fees and costs of collection, and reasonable attorneys’ fees, at an annual interest rate not to exceed 12 percent, commencing 30 days after the assessment becomes due, unless the time-share instrument specifies the recovery of interest at a lower rate, in which case, the lower rate of interest shall apply.

(b) Regular assessments imposed or collected to perform the obligations of an association under the governing documents of this title shall be exempt from execution by a judgment creditor of the association only to the extent necessary for the association to perform essential services, such as paying for utilities and insurance. In determining the appropriateness of an exemption, a court shall ensure that only essential services are protected under this subdivision. This exemption shall not apply to any consensual pledges, liens, or encumbrances that have been approved by the owners of the association, constituting a quorum, casting a majority of the votes at a meeting or election of the association, or to any state tax lien, or to any lien for labor or materials supplied to the common area.

(c) The association shall provide notice by first-class mail to the owners of the time-share interests of any increase in the regular or special assessments of the association, not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days prior to the increased assessment becoming due.

(d) Associations are hereby exempted from interest rate limitations imposed by Article XV of the California Constitution, subject to the limitations of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 429, Sec. 9.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operation is immediate, and not delayed by Sec. 12 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

11266.

(a) An amendment of a provision of the declaration or other document establishing the time-share plan may not be adopted without the vote or written assent of at least 25 percent of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer.

(b) An amendment of the articles of incorporation or association may not be enacted without the vote or written assent of at least 25 percent of the governing body and 25 percent of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer.

(c) An amendment of the bylaws of the association may not be enacted without the vote or written assent of at least 10 percent of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer.

(d) An amendment to the rules and regulations of the association may not be enacted without the vote or written assent of at least a majority of the governing body of the association.

(e) The percentage of the voting power necessary to amend a specific clause or provision in the time-share instrument, articles, or bylaws shall not be less than the prescribed percentage of affirmative votes or written assents required for action to be taken under that clause.

(f) In addition to the restrictions upon the enactment of amendments of the governing instruments set forth in this section, the governing instruments may include provisions consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 11269 whereby the vote of the developer must be given effect in the amendatory process.

(g) For a single site time-share plan or a component site of a specific time-share interest time-share plan or a nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plan located outside this state, that is being offered in this state, the public report shall include the following disclosure in conspicuous 14-point type:
THE DECLARATION OR OTHER DOCUMENT ESTABLISHING THIS TIME-SHARE PLAN MAY BE AMENDED BY A VOTE OF ____% OF THE MEMBERS OF THE ASSOCIATION. THE BYLAWS OF THE ASSOCIATION MAY BE AMENDED BY A VOTE OF ____% OF THE MEMBERS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11267.

(a) The time-share instruments shall require the use of a managing entity for the time-share plan or component site pursuant to a written management agreement that shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) Delegation of authority to the managing entity to carry out the duties and obligations of the association or the developer to the time-share interest owners.

(2) Authority of the managing entity to use subagents, if applicable.

(3) A term of not more than five years with automatic renewals for successive three-year periods after expiration of the first term unless the association by the vote or written assent of a majority of
 the voting power residing in members other than the developer determines not to renew the contract and gives appropriate notice of that determination. However, in those time-share plans where the association is controlled by owners other than the developer, the management agreement shall not be subject to the term limitations set forth in this section, and any longer term shall not be grounds for denial of a public report, unless the longer term of the management contract is the result of the developer exercising control.

(4) Termination for cause at any time by the governing body of the association. If the single site time-share plan or the component site of a multisite time-share plan is located within the state, then that termination provision shall include a provision for arbitration in accordance with the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association or another third-party arbitration organization selected by the
 parties and in accordance with Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure if requested by or on behalf of the managing entity.

(5) Not less than 90 days’ written notice to the association of the intention of the managing entity to resign.

(6) Enumeration of the powers and duties of the managing entity in the operation of the time-share plan and the maintenance of the accommodations comprising the time-share plan.

(7) Compensation to be paid to the managing entity.

(8) Records to be maintained by the managing entity.

(9) A requirement that the managing entity provide a policy for fidelity insurance or bond for the activities of the managing entity,
 payable to the association that shall be in an amount no less than the sum of the largest amount of funds expected to be held or controlled by the managing entity at any time during the year, pursuant to the budget. The commissioner may provide a reduction in the insurance policy or bond amounts required by this paragraph.

(10) Errors and omissions insurance coverage for the managing entity, if available.

(11) Delineation of the authority of the managing entity and persons authorized by the managing entity to enter into accommodations of the time-share plan for the purpose of cleaning, maid service, maintenance and repair, including emergency repairs, and for the purpose of abating a nuisance or dangerous, unlawful, or prohibited activity being conducted in the accommodation.

(12) Description of the duties of the
 managing entity, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Collection of all assessments as provided in the time-share instruments.

(B) Maintenance of all books and records concerning the time-share plan.

(C) Scheduling occupancy of accommodations, when purchasers are not entitled to use specific time-share periods, so that all purchasers will be provided the opportunity for use and possession of the accommodations of the time-share plan, that they have purchased.

(D) Providing for the annual meeting of the association of owners.

(E) Performing any other functions and duties related to the maintenance of the accommodations or that are required by the time-share instrument.

(b) Any written management agreement in existence as of the effective date of this chapter shall not be subject to the term limitations set forth above.

(c) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state, the time-share instruments shall include the subject matter set forth in subdivision (a). The time-share instruments shall be in compliance with the applicable laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property or component site is located, and if a conflict exists between laws of the situs state and the requirements set forth in this section, the law of the situs state shall control. If the time-share instruments provide for the matters contained in subdivision (a), the time-share instruments shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a) and the developer shall not be
 required to make revisions in order to comply with subdivision (a) and this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 14.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11268.

(a) Unless impracticable because of the number of members of the association, their places of residence in relation to each other, the international nature of the offering, or other factors, provision shall be made for regular meetings of members of the association of time-share interest owners. Ordinarily regular meetings of members shall be scheduled not less frequently than once each calendar year at a time and place to be fixed by the bylaws or by resolution of the governing body. The first meeting of the association shall be scheduled not later than one year after the closing of the escrow for the first sale of a time-share interest in the time-share plan or completion of construction, whichever shall first occur.

(b) Provision shall be made for special meetings of the association to be promptly called by the governing body upon either of the following:

(1) The vote of a majority of the governing body.

(2) Receipt of a written request signed by members representing at least 5 percent of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer.

(c) Meetings of the association shall be held at a suitable location that is readily accessible at reasonable cost to the largest possible number of members.

(d) Written notice of regular and special meetings shall be given to members by first-class mail. This notice shall be given not less than 14 days and not more than 90 days before the scheduled date of the meeting. The notice, whether for a regular or special meeting shall specify the place, day, and hour of the meeting and a brief statement of the matters which the governing body intends to present, or believes that others will present, for action by the members.

(e) (1) The bylaws of the association shall establish the quorum for a meeting of members at not less than 5 percent nor more than 3313 percent, of the voting power of the association residing in members other than the developer, represented in person or by proxy.

(2) In the absence of a quorum as prescribed by the bylaws, no business shall be conducted and the presiding officer shall adjourn the meeting sine die.

(3) If less than one-third of the total voting power of the association is in attendance, in person or by proxy, at a regular or special meeting of the association, only those matters of business, the general nature of which was given in the notice of the meeting may be voted upon by the members.

(f) Any action that may be taken at any regular or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the following requirements are met:

(1) A written ballot is distributed to every member entitled to vote setting forth the proposed action, providing an opportunity to signify approval or disapproval of the proposal, and providing a reasonable time for the members to return the ballot to the association.

(2) The number of votes cast by ballot within the specified time period equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action.

(3) The number of approvals of the action equals or exceeds the number of votes required to approve the action at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by written ballot.

(4) The written ballot distributed to members of the association affords an opportunity for the member to specify a choice between approval and disapproval of each order of business proposed to be acted upon by the association and further provides that the vote of the members shall be cast in accordance with the choice specified.

(g) The bylaws of the association may provide that governing body members may be elected by written ballot.

(h) A form of proxy may be distributed to each member to afford him or her the opportunity to vote in absentia at a meeting of members of the association provided that it meets the requirements for a written ballot set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and includes the name or names of members who expect to be in attendance in person at the meeting to whom the proxy is to be given for the purpose of casting the vote to reflect the absent member’s vote as specified in the form of proxy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11269.

(a) A member of an association including associations that provide for unequal assessments against members, shall be entitled to one vote for each time-share interest owned.

(b) An association may have two classes of members for voting purposes according to the following provisions:

(1) Each time-share interest owner other than the developer of the time-share plan shall be a class A member. If a time-share interest is owned by more than one person, each time-share interest owner shall be a class A member, but only one vote may be cast for each interest.

(2) The developer shall be the class B member and shall have one vote for each time-share interest owned by him or her which has been authorized to be offered for sale by the issuance of a public report.

(3) Class B membership shall be automatically converted to class A membership, and class B membership shall thereafter cease to exist, when the total outstanding votes held by the class B member falls below 20 percent of the total voting power of the association.

(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided, no regulation which requires the approval of a prescribed percentage of the voting power residing in members other than the developer or a prescribed percentage of the voting power of class A members, for action to be taken by the association, is intended to preclude the developers from casting votes attributable to the time-share interests which he or she owns. Governing instruments may specify the following with respect to approval of action by the membership of the association other than an action to enforce an obligation of the developer:

(1) In those associations in which class A and class B memberships exist, the vote or written assent of a prescribed percentage of the class A voting power and the vote or written assent of the class B member.

(2) In those associations in which a single class of voting membership exists, either as originally established or after the conversion of the class B membership to class A memberships, the vote or written assent of a prescribed percentage of the total voting power of the association and the vote or written assent of a prescribed percentage of the voting power of members other than the developer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11270.

(a) The governing body shall consist of three directors for an association that does not contemplate more than 100 members and either five or seven directors for an association that contemplates more than 100 members.

(b) (1) The first governing body shall consist of directors appointed by the developer. These directors shall serve until the first meeting of the association at which time an election of all of the directors for the association shall be conducted.

(2) A special procedure shall be established by the governing instruments to assure that at the first election of the governing body, and at all times thereafter, at least one of the incumbent directors has been elected solely by the votes of members other than the developer.

(3) A director who has been elected to office solely by the votes of the members of the association other than the developer may be removed from the governing body prior to the expiration of his or her term of office only by a vote of a prescribed percentage of the voting power residing in members other than the developer.

(c) The terms of office of governing body members may be staggered provided that no person may serve a term of more than three years without standing for reelection.

(d) For board of director members serving at the appointment of the developer, the developer may change the designated board member without the need of any further consent by the association. However, the term of the applicable director’s seat on the governing body shall not be affected by that change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11271.

(a) Regular meetings of the governing body of the association shall be held as prescribed in the bylaws, but not less frequently than annually.

(b) (1) Regular and special meetings of the governing body shall be held in or near the location of the time-share plan unless a meeting at another location would significantly reduce the cost to the association or the inconvenience to directors.

(2) If the time and place of the regular meeting of the governing body is not fixed by the governing instruments, notice of the time and place of meeting shall be communicated in writing, including by facsimile, electronic mail, or other form of written or electronic communication, to directors not less than 14 days prior to the meeting. However, that notice of a meeting is not required to be given to any governing body member who has signed a waiver of notice or a written consent to the holding of the meeting.

(c) (1) A special meeting of the governing body may be called by written notice signed by any two members of the governing body.

(2) The notice of a special meeting shall specify the time and place of the meeting and the nature of any special business to be considered.

(3) Notice of a special meeting shall be communicated in writing, including by facsimile, electronic mail, or other form of written or electronic communication, to directors not less than 14 days prior to the meeting. However, notice of the meeting is not required to be given to any governing body member who signed a waiver of notice or a written consent to the holding of the meeting.

(d) (1) Regular and special meetings of the governing body shall be open to all members of the association provided that members who are not on the governing body may not participate in any deliberations or discussions unless expressly so authorized by the governing body.

(2) The governing body may, with the approval of a majority of a quorum of its members, adjourn a meeting and reconvene in executive session to discuss and vote upon personnel matters, litigation in which the association is or may become involved, and orders of business of a similar nature. The nature of any and all business to be considered in executive session shall first be announced in open session.

(e) A bare majority of the total members of authorized members of the governing body shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business.
